Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 57. Intercollegiate Athletics Review Commission.

§ 30-359.
Intercollegiate Athletics Review Commission; purpose; membership; terms; compensation and expenses.

As used in this chapter, “Commission” means the Intercollegiate Athletics Review Commission.

The Commission is established as an advisory commission in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission is to review the plan and financing recommendations of the board of visitors of any public institution of higher education in the Commonwealth relating to the institution adding a major intercollegiate athletics program such as football or basketball or changing the division level of any of its existing intercollegiate athletics programs as set forth in subsection I of §

23.1-1309

.

The Commission shall consist of eleven members as follows: the chair of the House Committee on Appropriations, or his designee, and three members of the House Committee on Appropriations appointed by the chair and the chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, or his designee, and two members of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations appointed by the chair. In addition, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Finance, and the Director of the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the Commission.

Members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The members of the Commission shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman annually. A majority of the voting members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

Members of the Commission shall receive such compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in the general appropriation act.

History.

2015, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 704, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subsection I of §

23.1-1309

” was substituted for “subsection I of § 23-1.2”
in subsection B to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

§ 30-360.
Review of plans to add a major intercollegiate athletics program or change the division level of an existing intercollegiate athletics program.

Within two business days of receipt of a plan and financing recommendations for changing the division level of any existing intercollegiate athletics program pursuant to subsection I of §

23.1-1309

, the Commission shall review the plan and notify the board of visitors of the public institution of higher education of its findings and recommendations.

Within 45 business days of receipt of a plan and financing recommendations for adding a major intercollegiate athletics program such as football or basketball pursuant to subsection I of §

23.1-1309

, the Commission shall review the plan and notify the board of visitors of the public institution of higher education of its findings and recommendations.

Findings and recommendations of the Commission may relate to (i) the potential financial impact of the addition of a major intercollegiate athletics program or a change in the division level of an existing intercollegiate athletics program upon the Commonwealth and students, (ii) the potential impact on the subsidy percentage, as that term is defined in §

23.1-1309

, or (iii) the policy aspects of such an addition or change. Review by the Commission shall not be construed to constitute approval of any appropriations necessary to implement any portion of the plan.

Findings and recommendations of the Commission shall require an affirmative vote by three of the five members from the House Committee on Appropriations and two of the three members from the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations.

History.

2015, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That for the purposes of this act, Old Dominion University (University) shall be considered a Division I-AA institution until July 1, 2020, and if the University continues to operate a Division I-A intercollegiate football program on July 1, 2020, the University shall subsequently be considered a Division I-A institution.”

Acts 2015, c. 704, cl. 3 provides: “That for the purposes of this act, The University of Virginia’s College at Wise (College) shall be considered a Division III institution until July 1, 2020, and if the College is made a full member of the NCAA Division II athletic program by July 1, 2020, the College shall subsequently be considered a Division II institution.”

Acts 2015, c. 704, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subsection I of §

23.1-1309

” was substituted for “subsection I of § 23-1.2”
in subsections A and B;
“23.1-1309” was substituted for “23-1.2”
in subsection C to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” in subsection D. March 10, 2021.

§ 30-361.
Staff; cooperation from other state agencies.

Administrative staff support shall be provided by the staffs of the House Committee on Appropriations and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations. Additional assistance as needed shall be provided by the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia.

History.

2015, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 704, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.